Utah statutes.
61-2c-302 (Superseded 01/01/10).   Record requirements.
(1)  For the time period specified in Subsection (2), a licensee shall make or
possess any record required for that licensee by a rule made by the division.
(2)  A licensee shall maintain in its possession a record described in
Subsection (1) for four years from the last to occur of the following:
(a)  the final entry on a residential mortgage loan is made by that licensee;
(b)  if the residential mortgage loan is serviced by the licensee:
(i)  the residential mortgage loan is paid in full; or
(ii)  the licensee ceases to service the residential mortgage loan; or
(c)  if the residential mortgage loan is not serviced by the licensee, the
residential mortgage loan is closed.
(3)  A licensee shall:
(a)  make available to the division for inspection and copying during normal
business hours all records required to be maintained under this chapter; and
(b)  upon reasonable notice from the division to a licensee, produce all
records described in Subsection (3)(a) that are related to an investigation
being conducted by the division at the division office for inspection and
copying by the division.
(4)  A licensed entity shall maintain and produce for inspection by the
division a current list of all individuals whose licenses are affiliated with
the entity.
